Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5536.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 30301. (1) As used in this part: (a) "Department" means the department of environmental quality.environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (b) "Director" means the director of the department. (c) "Exceptional wetland" means wetland that provides physical or biological functions essential to the natural resources of this state and that may be lost or degraded if not preserved through an approved site protection and management plan for the purposes purpose of providing compensatory wetland mitigation. (d) "Fill material" means soil, rocks, sand, waste of any kind, or any other material that displaces soil or water or reduces water retention potential. (e) "Hydric soil" means a soil that formed under conditions of saturation, flooding, or ponding long enough during the growing season to develop anaerobic conditions in the upper part. (f) "Landscape level wetland assessment" means the use of aerial photographs, maps, and other remotely sensed information to predict and evaluate wetland characteristics and functions in the context of all of the following: (i) The wetland's landscape position and hydrologic characteristics. (ii) The surrounding landscape. (iii) The historic extent and condition of the wetland. (g) "Minor drainage" includes means ditching and tiling for the removal of excess soil moisture incidental to the planting, cultivating, protecting, or harvesting of crops or improving the productivity of land in established use for agriculture, horticulture, silviculture, or lumbering. (h) "Nationwide permit" means a nationwide permit issued by the United States Army Corps of Engineers under 72 FR 11091 to 11198 (March 12, 2007), including all general conditions, regional conditions, and conditions imposed by this state pursuant to under a water quality certification under section 401 of title IV of the federal water pollution control act, 33 USC 1341, or a coastal zone management consistency determination under section 307 of the coastal zone management act of 1972, 16 USC 1456. (i) "Ordinary high-water mark" means the ordinary high-water mark as specified in section 32502. (j) "Person" means an individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, association, municipality, this state, an instrumentality or agency of this state, the federal government, an instrumentality or agency of the federal government, or other legal entity. (k) "Rapid wetland assessment" means a method for generally assessing the functions, values, and condition of individual wetlands based on existing data and field indicators. (l) "Rare and imperiled wetland" means any of the following: (i) Great Lakes marsh. (ii) Southern wet meadow. (iii) Inland salt marsh. (iv) Coastal plain marsh. (v) Interdunal wetland. (vi) Lakeplain wet prairie. (vii) Lakeplain wet-mesic prairie. (viii) Coastal fen. (ix) Wet-mesic prairie. (x) Wet prairie. (xi) Prairie fen. (xii) Northern fen. (xiii) Patterned fen. (xiv) Poor fen. (xv) Muskeg. (xvi) Relict conifer swamp. (xvii) Southern floodplain forest. (m) "Water dependent" means requiring access or proximity to or siting within an aquatic site to fulfill its basic purpose. (n) "Water of the United States" means waters of the United States as that term is used in section 502(7) of the federal water pollution control act, 33 USC 1362. (o) Except as defined in subdivision (p), "wetland" means a land or water feature, commonly referred to as a bog, swamp, or marsh, inundated or saturated by water at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances does support, hydric soils and a predominance of wetland vegetation or aquatic life. A land or water feature is not a wetland unless both of the following requirements are met: (i) It is adjacent to a water of the United States. (ii) It has a continuous surface connection with a water of the United States. A temporary interruption in a surface connection due to natural phenomena, including a seiche or dry spell, is not a break in the continuity of a surface connection. (p) (n) "Wetland" As used in a provision of section 30307 or 30308 that references this subdivision, "wetland" means a land or water feature, commonly referred to as a bog, swamp, or marsh, inundated or saturated by water at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances does support, hydric soils and a predominance of wetland vegetation or aquatic life. A land or water feature is not a wetland unless it meets any of the following: (i) Is a water of the United States. as that term is used in section 502(7) of the federal water pollution control act, 33 USC 1362. (ii) Is contiguous to the Great Lakes, Lake St. Clair, an inland lake or pond, or a stream. As used in this subparagraph, "pond" does not include a farm or stock pond constructed consistent with the exemption under section 30305(2)(g). (iii) Is more than 5 acres in size. (iii) (iv) Has the documented presence of an endangered or threatened species under part 365 or the endangered species act of 1973, Public Law 93-205.16 USC 1531 to 1544. (iv) (v) Is a rare and imperiled wetland. (2) In 2019 and every 5 years thereafter, after, the department of natural resources may make recommendations to the legislature for changes in the list of rare and imperiled wetlands to reflect the status of each type of wetland to be included on the list as rare and imperiled throughout this state. (3) As used in section 30312f: (a) "Altered or degraded wetland" means wetland that meets any of the following criteria: (i) Has been partially or fully drained, such as by ditching, tiling, or pumping. (ii) Has been partially or fully filled by direct placement of material in the wetland or significant sedimentation. (iii) Invasive plant species dominate in a majority of the vegetated surface area of the wetland. (iv) Has undergone land use conversion or alteration to vegetation, soil, or hydrology that currently affects the wetland functions and services. (b) "Former wetland" means land that was wetland but that has been modified to the point that it no longer has the hydrologic characteristics of wetland. (c) "Net increase in wetland functions and services" means an increase in 1 or more wetland functions and services with not more than a minimal decrease in other wetland functions and services. (d) "Voluntary wetland restoration project", subject to subdivision (e), means any of the following: (i) Activities that are voluntarily undertaken to restore, reestablish, rehabilitate, or enhance altered or degraded wetland or former wetland and that result in a net increase in wetland functions and services. (ii) Activities to maintain or manage sites where activities described in subparagraph (i) have taken place, including sites restored before October 1, 1980, the effective date of former 1979 PA 203. (e) Voluntary wetland restoration project does not include an activity undertaken to fulfill, currently or in the future, a federal, state, or local wetland permit mitigation requirement. (f) "Wetland functions and services" means any of the following: (i) Wetland hydrology that approximates the predisturbance condition or that emulates the natural condition of the wetland. (ii) Fish and wildlife habitat quality or quantity. (iii) Plant community quality, characterized by native vegetation types and diversity. (iv) Water- and soil-related functions of the wetland, such as nutrient removal, sediment retention, flood control, or groundwater recharge. (v) Recreational use of the wetland, including, but not limited to, fishing, hunting, trapping, and birdwatching. (4) The department and local units of government shall apply the technical wetland delineation standards set forth in the United States Army Corps of Engineers January, 1987, Wetland Delineation Manual, technical report Y-87-1, and appropriate regional United States Army Corps of Engineers supplements, in identifying wetland boundaries under this part, including, but not limited to, section 30307. Sec. 30307. (1) Within Not later than 60 days after receipt of the completed application and fee, the department may hold a hearing. If a hearing is held, it shall must be held in the county where the wetland to which the permit is to apply is located. Notice of the hearing shall must be given in the same manner as for the promulgation of rules under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. The department may approve or disapprove a permit application without a public hearing unless a person requests a hearing in writing within not later than 20 days after the mailing of notification of the permit application as required by subsection (3) or unless the department determines that the permit application is of significant impact so as to warrant a public hearing. (2) The action taken by the department on a permit application under this part or part 13 may be appealed pursuant to in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. A property owner may, after exhaustion of administrative remedies, bring appropriate legal action in a court of competent jurisdiction. (3) The department shall post on its website, and shall have a process to provide electronic mail notification of, all of the following under this part: (a) A list of pending applications. (b) Public notices. (c) Public hearing schedules. (4) A local unit of government may regulate wetland, as defined in section 30301(p), within its boundaries, by ordinance, only as provided under this part. This subsection is supplemental to the existing authority of a local unit of government. An ordinance adopted by a local unit of government pursuant to under this subsection shall must comply with all of the following: (a) The ordinance shall not provide a different definition of wetland than is provided in this part, except that a wetland ordinance may regulate wetland of less than 5 acres in size. (a) (b) If the ordinance regulates wetland, as defined in section 30301(p), that is smaller than 2 acres in size, the ordinance shall must comply with section 30309. (b) (c) The ordinance shall must comply with sections 30308 and 30310. (c) (d) The ordinance shall must not require a permit for uses that are authorized without a permit under section 30305, and shall must otherwise comply with this part. (5) A local unit of government that adopts an ordinance regulating wetlands, as defined in section 30301(p), under subsection (4) shall notify the department. (6) A local unit of government that adopts an ordinance regulating wetlands, as defined in section 30301(p), shall use an application form supplied by the department, and each person applying for a permit shall make application directly to the local unit of government. Upon On receipt, the local unit of government shall forward a copy of each application along with any state fees that may have been submitted under section 30306 to the department. The If applicable, the department shall begin reviewing the application as provided in this part. The local unit of government shall review the application pursuant to under its ordinance and shall modify, approve, or deny the application within not later than 90 days after receipt. If a local unit of government does not approve or disapprove the permit application within the time period provided by this subsection, the permit application shall must be considered approved, and the local unit of government shall must be considered to have made the determinations as listed in section 30311. The denial of a permit shall must be accompanied by a written statement of all reasons for denial. The failure to supply complete information with a permit application may be reason for denial of a permit. If requested, the department shall inform a person whether or not a local unit of government has an ordinance regulating wetlands, as defined in section 30301(p). If the department receives an application with respect to a wetland, as defined in section 30301(p), located in a local unit of government that has an ordinance regulating wetlands, as defined in section 30301(p), the department immediately shall forward the application to the local unit of government, which shall modify, deny, or approve the application under this subsection. The local unit of government shall notify the department of its decision. The If applicable, the department shall proceed as provided in this part. (7) If a local unit of government does not have an ordinance regulating wetlands, as defined in section 30301(p), the department shall promptly send a copy of the permit application to the local unit of government where the wetland is located. The local unit of government may review the application; may hold a hearing on the application; may recommend approval, modification, or denial of the application to the department or may notify the department that the local unit of government declines to make a recommendation. The recommendation of the local unit of government, if any, shall must be made and returned to the department within not later than 45 days after the local unit of government's receipt of the permit application. (8) In addition to the requirements of subsection (7), the department shall notify the local unit of government that the department has issued a permit under this part pertaining to wetland located within the jurisdiction of that local unit of government within not later than 15 days of after issuance of the permit. The department shall enclose a copy of the permit with the notice. Sec. 30308. (1) Prior to Before the effective date of an ordinance authorized under section 30307(4), a local unit of government that wishes to adopt such an ordinance shall complete and make available to the public at a reasonable cost an inventory of all wetland, as defined in section 30301(p), within the local unit of government, except that a local unit of government located in a county that has a population of less than 100,000 is not required to include public lands on its map. A local unit of government shall make a draft of the inventory map available to the public, shall provide for public notice and comment opportunity prior to before finalizing the inventory map, and shall respond in writing to written comments received by the local unit of government regarding the contents of the inventory. A local unit of government that has a wetland ordinance on December 18, 1992 has until June 18, 1994 to complete an inventory map and to otherwise comply with this part, or the local unit of government shall not continue to enforce that ordinance. Upon On completion of an inventory map or upon on a subsequent amendment of an inventory map, the local unit of government shall notify each record owner of property on the property tax roll of the local unit of government that the inventory maps exist or have been amended, where the maps may be reviewed, that the owner's property may be designated as a wetland, as defined in section 30301(p), on the inventory map, and that the local unit of government has an ordinance regulating wetland, as defined in section 30301(p). The notice shall must also inform the property owner that the inventory map does not necessarily include all of the wetlands, as defined in section 30301(p), within the local unit of government that may be subject to the wetland ordinance. The notice may be given by including the required information with the annual notice of the property owner's property tax assessment. A wetland inventory map does not create any legally enforceable presumptions regarding whether property that is or is not included on the inventory map is or is not a wetland, as defined in section 30301(p). (2) A local unit of government that adopts a wetland ordinance regulating wetland, as defined in section 30301(p), shall process a wetland use applications application for use of a wetland, as defined in section 30301(p), in a manner that ensures that the same entity makes decisions on site plans, plats, and related matters, and wetland determinations, and that the applicant is not required to submit to a hearing on the application before more than 1 local unit of government decision making body. This requirement does not apply to either of the following: (a) A preliminary review by a planning department, planning consultant, or planning commission, prior to before submittal to the decision making body if required by an ordinance. (b) An appeal process that is provided for appeal to the legislative body or other body designated to hear appeals.